Maine, session 132, LD76.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §10252, as affected by PL 2003, c. 614, §9 and amended by c.
655, Pt. B, §51 and affected by §422, is further amended to read:
§10252. Fish hatchery maintenance fund
The fish hatchery maintenance fund, referred to in this section as "the "fund," is
established in the department as a nonlapsing fund to be used by the commissioner to fund
or assist in funding engineering designs for the Embden Hatchery,; a statewide assessment
of all other hatchery facilities and; maintenance, repair and capital improvements at fish
hatcheries and feeding stations owned by the State; and overtime personnel services costs
when overtime for fish stocking and other hatchery-related work is operationally required.
The fund may not be used to fund personnel services costs or the general operating costs
of a fish hatchery or to fund personnel services costs other than those allowed pursuant to
this section. The commissioner may accept and deposit into the fund any monetary gifts,
donations or other contributions from public or private sources and must use that money
for the purposes specified in this section.